Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-2003
Public Counsel; established; powers and duties; appointment.

The office of Public Counsel is hereby established to exercise the authority and perform the duties under the Office of Public Counsel Act. The Public Counsel shall be appointed by the Legislature, with the vote of two-thirds of the members required for approval of such appointment from nominations submitted by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 2, p. 2879;

Laws 2012, LB821, § 42;

Laws 2015, LB598, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,241;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 3.